Hawaii statutes.
[§159-55] Citation and summons. (a)
There shall be printed a form of citation and summons for use in citing
violators warning the person to appear and answer the charge against the person
at a certain place and at a time within seven days after the citation. The
citation and summons shall be so designed to include all necessary information
to make it valid and legal within the laws and rules of the State. The form
and contents of the citation and summons shall be adopted or prescribed by the
district courts.

(b) In every case when a citation and summons
is issued, the original of the same shall be given to the accused; provided
that the district courts may prescribe the issuance to the accused of a carbon
copy of the citation and summons and provide for the disposition of the
original and any other copies.

(c) Every citation and summons shall be
consecutively numbered and each carbon copy shall bear the number of its
original. [L 1986, c 206, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next